Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; TRAFFIC SAFETY.new text end new text begin $8,400,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for grants to school districts, nonpublic schools, charter schools, and companies that provide school bus services for the purchase and installation of school bus stop-signal arm camera systems. In awarding grants, the commissioner must follow the same requirements as under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 5, article 1, section 4, subdivision 5. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end